Vermont, session 2025-2026, S215.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 6603 is amended to read:
§ 6603. SECRETARY; POWERS
In addition to any other powers conferred on him or her the Secretary by
law, the Secretary shall have the power to:
VT LEG #385796 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.215
2026 Page 2 of 5
(1) Adopt, amend, and repeal rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25
implementing the provisions of this chapter.
* * *
(11) Establish by rule a program for the certification of environmental
professionals involved in the identification, investigation, and remediation of a
site contaminated by a hazardous substance. A rule for certification of
environmental professionals shall establish criteria for eligibility; requirements
for submission of information related to the identification, investigation, and
remediation of properties impacted by the release of a hazardous material; and
any other requirements that the Secretary determines are necessary for
improved efficiency of the process. The Secretary may establish classes or
categories of certifications for environmental professionals.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 6615b is amended to read:
§ 6615b. CORRECTIVE ACTION PROCEDURES
(a) Any person who is determined to be liable for the release or threatened
release of a hazardous material as established in section 6615 of this title shall
take all of the following actions to mitigate the effects of the release:
(1) Submit for approval by the Secretary a work plan for an
investigation of the contaminated site. This shall be submitted within 30 days
from either the date of the discharge or release or the date that the release was
discovered if the date of the discharge or release is not known, or within a
VT LEG #385796 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.215
2026 Page 3 of 5
period of time established by an alternative schedule approved by the
Secretary. The site investigation shall define the nature, degree, and extent of
the contamination, and shall assess potential impacts on human health and the
environment.
(2) Perform the site investigation within 90 days of after receiving
written approval of the work plan by the Secretary, or within a period of time
established by an alternative schedule approved by the Secretary. A report
detailing the findings of this work shall be sent to the Secretary for review.
(3) Submit a corrective action plan, within 30 days from the date of final
acceptance of the site investigation report by the Secretary, or within a period
of time established by an alternative schedule approved by the Secretary.
(4) Implement the corrective action plan within 90 days upon approval
of the plan by the Secretary, or within a period of time established by an
alternative schedule approved by the Secretary. The corrective action activity
shall be continued until the contamination is remediated to levels approved by
the Secretary. The Secretary may allow for the remediation of a site
contaminated with a hazardous material without requiring certification and
permitting under sections 556, 6605, and 6606 of this title, provided such
activity will not, in the Secretary’s opinion, adversely affect either public
health and safety or the environment, and provided such activity is conducted
in accordance with standards developed by the Secretary.
VT LEG #385796 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.215
2026 Page 4 of 5
(5) Submit to the Secretary all investigative, corrective action, and
monitoring reports, including all analytical results related to subdivisions (3)–
(5) of this subsection, as they become available.
(b)(1) If the person who is responsible for the actions required by
subsection (a) of this section fails to meet the time frames established by that
subsection or an alternate schedule approved by the Secretary, the person shall
be charged a late fee of $500.00.
(2) If the person is participating in the program established pursuant to
subchapter 3 of this chapter and fails to meet the time frames established in
subsection (a) of this section or an alternate schedule approved by the
Secretary, the person shall be charged a late fee of $250.00.
(3) Fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the
Fund created pursuant to section 1283 of this chapter (Environmental
Contingency Fund).
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 8504 is amended to read:
§ 8504. APPEALS TO THE ENVIRONMENTAL DIVISION
* * *
(r) With respect to review of an act or decision of the Secretary pursuant to
subdivision 6603(11) of this title, the Secretary may reverse or modify the act
or decision only if the Secretary determines that the act or decision was
arbitrary, capricious, or an abuse of discretion.
VT LEG #385796 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.215
2026 Page 5 of 5
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385796 v.1